Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 3. Privacy Expectation Afterlife and Choices Act.

§§ 64.2-109 through 64.2-115.
Repealed by Acts 2017, cc. 33 and 80, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current similar provisions, see §

64.2-116

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

64.2-109

through 64.2-115, regarding the Privacy Expectation Afterlife and Choices Act, were derived from Acts 2013, cc. 280, 369; 2015, c. 657.